Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202617-209.01
Board of trustees; powers of village clerk; resolution required; duties.

(1) Annually at the first regular meeting of the village board of trustees in December, or as soon as reasonably possible thereafter, the board shall pass a resolution authorizing the village clerk to prepare claims and issue warrants for the village. The resolution shall specify that the village clerk:

(a) Is only authorized to exercise the authority authorized by the resolution if vacancies exist for more than one-half of the members of the board;

(b) Is only authorized to prepare claims and issue warrants:

(i) For expenditures previously approved by the village board of trustees; and

(ii) When required by law or enforceable contractual obligations; and

(c) Shall have no authority to conduct village business beyond the authority provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection.

(2) If vacancies exist for more than one-half of the members of the village board of trustees, the village clerk may exercise the powers granted under subsection (1) of this section until the vacancies are filled pursuant to subsection (3) of section 32-569.

(3) The village board of trustees shall review any claims and warrants issued pursuant to this section once vacancies no longer exist for more than one-half of the members of the board.

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 3.
April 16, 2026